Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska66-2106
Jurisdictional utility; applicability
of other law.

A
jurisdictional utility shall not be subject to the State Natural Gas Regulation
Act to the extent it is exercising power granted in section 66-2104 except
as specifically provided otherwise but shall be subject to sections 75-501
to 75-503.

Laws 2012, LB1115, § 6.

State Natural Gas Regulation Act, see section 66-1801.